California, session 20252026, SB849.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 2307 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:2307. (a) Except as provided in subdivision (i), a person whose certificate has been surrendered while under investigation or while charges are pending or whose certificate has been revoked or suspended or placed on probation, may petition the board for reinstatement or modification of penalty, including modification or termination of probation.(b) The person may file the petition after a period of not less than the following minimum periods have elapsed from the effective date of the surrender of the certificate or the decision ordering that disciplinary action:(1) At least five years for reinstatement of a license surrendered or revoked for unprofessional conduct, except that the board may, for good cause shown, specify in a revocation order that a petition for reinstatement may be filed after three years.(2) At least two years for early termination of probation or after more than one-half of the probation term has elapsed, whichever is greater.(3) At least one year for modification of a condition, or reinstatement of a license surrendered or revoked for mental or physical illness, or termination of probation of less than three years.(c) The petition shall state any facts as may be required by the board. The petition shall be accompanied by at least two verified recommendations from physicians and surgeons licensed in any state who have personal knowledge of the activities of the petitioner since the disciplinary penalty was imposed.(d) The petition may be heard by a panel of the board. The board may assign the petition to an administrative law judge designated in Section 11371 of the Government Code. After a hearing on the petition, the administrative law judge shall provide a proposed decision to the board or the California Board of Podiatric Medicine, as applicable, which shall be acted upon in accordance with Section 2335.(e) The panel of the board or the administrative law judge hearing the petition may consider all activities of the petitioner since the disciplinary action was taken, the offense for which the petitioner was disciplined, the petitioner’s activities during the time the certificate was in good standing, and the petitioner’s rehabilitative efforts, general reputation for truth, and professional ability. The hearing may be continued from time to time as the administrative law judge designated in Section 11371 of the Government Code finds necessary.(f) The administrative law judge designated in Section 11371 of the Government Code reinstating a certificate or modifying a penalty may recommend the imposition of any terms and conditions deemed necessary.(g) No petition shall be considered while the petitioner is under sentence for any criminal offense, including any period during which the petitioner is on court-imposed probation or parole. No petition shall be considered while there is an accusation or petition to revoke probation pending against the person. The board shall automatically reject a petition for early termination or modification of probation if the board files a petition to revoke probation while the petition for early termination or modification of the probation is pending. The board may deny without a hearing or argument any petition filed pursuant to this section within a period of three years from the effective date of the prior decision following a hearing under this section.(h) This section is applicable to and may be carried out with regard to licensees of the California Board of Podiatric Medicine. In lieu of two verified recommendations from physicians and surgeons, the petition shall be accompanied by at least two verified recommendations from doctors of podiatric medicine licensed in any state who have personal knowledge of the activities of the petitioner since the date the disciplinary penalty was imposed.(i) (1) The board shall not reinstate the certificate of a person under any of the following circumstances:(A) The person’s certificate was surrendered while a board accusation was pending against their license that alleges the person committed an act of sexual abuse, misconduct, or relations with a patient pursuant to Section 726 or sexual exploitation as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 729.(B) The person’s certificate has been revoked based on a finding by the board that the person committed an act of sexual abuse, misconduct, or relations with a patient pursuant to Section 726 or sexual exploitation as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 729.(C) The person was convicted in a court in or outside of this state of any offense that, if committed or attempted in this state, based on the elements of the convicted offense, would have been punishable as one or more of the offenses described in subdivision (c) of Section 290 of the Penal Code, and the person engaged in the offense with a patient or client, or with a former patient or client if the relationship was terminated primarily for the purpose of committing the offense.(D) The person has been required to register as a sex offender pursuant to the provisions of Section 290 of the Penal Code, regardless of whether the conviction has been appealed, and the person engaged in the offense with a patient or client, or with a former patient or client if the relationship was terminated primarily for the purpose of committing the offense.(2) A plea or a verdict of guilty or a conviction after a plea of nolo contendere is deemed to be a conviction within the meaning of this section. The record of conviction shall be conclusive evidence of the fact that the conviction occurred.(3) This subdivision does not apply to an applicant who is required to register as a sex offender pursuant to Section 290 of the Penal Code solely because of a misdemeanor conviction under Section 314 of the Penal Code.(4)(A)Notwithstanding any other law, if a person’s certificate was revoked based on a finding by the board that the person committed an act specified in paragraph (1), and the certificate was subsequently reinstated by the board on or after January 1, 2020, the certificate shall be automatically revoked and the person shall not petition the board for reinstatement or renewal of the certificate.(B)Upon revocation of the physician’s and surgeon’s certificate pursuant to this paragraph, the holder of the certificate may request a hearing within 30 days of the revocation. The proceeding shall be conducted in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).(C)It is the intent of the Legislature that this paragraph have retroactive application.(j) Nothing in this section shall be deemed to alter Sections 822 and 823.